Illinois, session 104th, HB5028.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Special Forest Preserve District 8Retailers' and Service Occupation Tax Fund. 9    Section 10. The Downstate Forest Preserve District Act is 10amended by adding Section 13.10 as follows: 11    (70 ILCS 805/13.10 new)12    Sec. 13.10. Kendall County Forest Preserve District 13retailers' and service occupation tax.14    (a) The Board of the Kendall County Forest Preserve 15District may impose a tax upon all persons engaged in the 16business of selling, including leasing, tangible personal 17property, other than personal property titled or registered 18with an agency of this State's government, at retail in the 19county on the gross receipts from the sales made in the course 20of business to provide revenue to be used by the forest 21preserve district in that county for general forest preserve   HB5028- 2 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1district purposes, including education, outdoor recreation, 2maintenance, operations, public safety at the forest 3preserves, trails, acquiring and restoring land, and any other 4lawful purposes or programs determined by the board of that 5district, except as otherwise provided in this Section, if a 6proposition for the tax has been submitted to the legal voters 7of that county and approved by a majority of those voting on 8the question as provided in subsection (d). If imposed, this 9tax shall be imposed only in 0.25% increments and may not be 10more than 1%.11    The tax imposed under this subsection may not be imposed 12on tangible personal property taxed at the 1% rate under the 13Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. The tax imposed under this 14subsection shall not be imposed on sales of aviation fuel for 15so long as the revenue use requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) 16and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are binding on the board.17    For a tax imposed for forest preserve purposes for 18expenditures authorized under this Act, the board must publish 19notice of the operational, capital, or master plan of the 20district, and must make the plan publicly available, before 21approval of the ordinance or resolution imposing the tax.22    If a tax is imposed for specific operational needs, 23capital projects, or public facilities, then the name of the 24project may be included in the proposition at the discretion 25of the board as determined in the enabling resolution. 26Examples are the "XXX Regional Trail", the "YYY Forest   HB5028- 3 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1Preserve or Multi-Use Facility", or the "ZZZ Natural Area 2Acquisition or Restoration Project". 3    The tax imposed by the board under this subsection and all 4civil penalties that may be assessed as an incident of the tax 5shall be collected and enforced by the Department of Revenue. 6The certificate of registration that is issued by the 7Department of Revenue to a retailer under the Retailers' 8Occupation Tax Act shall permit the retailer to engage in a 9business that is taxable without registering separately with 10the Department of Revenue under an ordinance or resolution 11adopted under this subsection. The Department of Revenue shall 12administer and enforce this subsection, collect all taxes and 13penalties due under this subsection, dispose of taxes and 14penalties so collected in the manner provided in this 15subsection, and determine all rights to credit memoranda 16arising on account of the erroneous payment of a tax or penalty 17under this subsection.18    In the administration of and compliance with this 19subsection, the Department of Revenue and persons who are 20subject to this subsection shall (i) have the same rights, 21remedies, privileges, immunities, powers, and duties; (ii) be 22subject to the same conditions, restrictions, limitations, 23penalties, and definitions of terms; and (iii) employ the same 24modes of procedure as are prescribed in Sections 1, 1a, 1a-1, 251d, 1e, 1f, 1i, 1j, 1j.1, 1j.2, 1k, 1m, 1n, 1o, 1p, 1q, 1r, 1s, 262 through 2-70, 2a, 2b, 2c, 2h, 2i, 2j, 3 (except provisions   HB5028- 4 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1relating to transaction returns and quarter monthly payments), 24, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 5j, 5k, 5l, 5m, 5n, 6, 36a, 6b, 6c, 6d, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 11a, 12, and 13 of the 4Retailers' Occupation Tax Act and the Uniform Penalty and 5Interest Act as if those provisions were set forth in this 6subsection.7    Persons subject to any tax imposed under this subsection 8may reimburse themselves for their sellers' tax liability by 9separately stating the tax as an additional charge. The charge 10may be stated in combination, in a single amount, with State 11tax which sellers are required to collect under the Use Tax Act 12in accordance with the bracketed schedules as the Department 13of Revenue may prescribe.14    If the Department of Revenue determines that a refund 15should be made under this subsection to a claimant instead of 16issuing a credit memorandum, then the Department of Revenue 17shall notify the State Comptroller, who shall cause the order 18to be drawn for the amount specified and to the person named in 19the notification from the Department of Revenue. The refund 20shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of the Special Forest 21Preserve District Retailers' and Service Occupation Tax Fund.22    (b) If a tax has been imposed under subsection (a), then a 23service occupation tax shall also be imposed upon all persons 24in the county engaged in the business of making sales of 25service, at the same rate of tax as imposed under subsection 26(a) of the selling price of all tangible personal property   HB5028- 5 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1transferred by the servicemen, including transfers by lease as 2an incident to a sale of service. The tax imposed under this 3subsection may not be imposed on tangible personal property 4taxed at the 1% rate under the Service Occupation Tax Act.5    The tax imposed under this subsection is not imposed on 6sales of aviation fuel for so long as the revenue use 7requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are 8binding on the board. The tax imposed under this subsection 9and all civil penalties that may be assessed as an incident 10thereof shall be collected and enforced by the Department of 11Revenue. The Department of Revenue shall administer and 12enforce this subsection; collect all taxes and penalties due 13hereunder; dispose of taxes and penalties so collected in the 14manner hereinafter provided; and determine all rights to 15credit memoranda arising on account of the erroneous payment 16of tax or penalty hereunder.17    In the administration of, and compliance with this 18subsection, the Department of Revenue and persons who are 19subject to this subsection shall (i) have the same rights, 20remedies, privileges, immunities, powers, and duties; (ii) be 21subject to the same conditions, restrictions, limitations, 22penalties, exclusions, exemptions, and definitions of terms; 23and (iii) employ the same modes of procedure as are prescribed 24in Sections 2 (except that the reference to State in the 25definition of supplier maintaining a place of business in this 26State shall mean the county), 2a, 2b, 2c, 2d, 3 through 3-50   HB5028- 6 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1(in respect to all provisions therein other than the State 2rate of tax), 4 (except that the reference to the State shall 3be to the county), 5, 7, 8 (except that the jurisdiction to 4which the tax shall be a debt to the extent indicated in that 5Section 8 shall be the county), 9 (except as to the disposition 6of taxes and penalties collected), 10, 11, 12 (except the 7reference therein to Section 2b of the Retailers' Occupation 8Tax Act), 13 (except that any reference to the State shall mean 9the county), Sections 15, 16, 17, 18, 19 and 20 of the Service 10Occupation Tax Act and the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act, 11as fully as if those provisions were set forth herein.12    Persons subject to any tax imposed under this subsection 13may reimburse themselves for their serviceman's tax liability 14by separately stating the tax as an additional charge, which 15charge may be stated in combination, in a single amount, with 16State tax that servicemen are authorized to collect under the 17Service Use Tax Act, in accordance with the bracket schedules 18as the Department of Revenue may prescribe.19    If the Department of Revenue determines that a refund 20should be made under this subsection to a claimant instead of 21issuing a credit memorandum, then the Department of Revenue 22shall notify the State Comptroller, who shall cause the 23warrant to be drawn for the amount specified, and to the person 24named, in the notification from the Department of Revenue. The 25refund shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of the Special 26Forest Preserve District Retailers' and Service Occupation Tax   HB5028- 7 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1Fund.2    (c) The tax imposed under this Section applies to leases 3of tangible personal property in effect, entered into, or 4renewed on or after the effective date of the ordinance 5imposing the tax under this Section in the same manner as the 6tax under this Section applies to other sales and consistent 7with the tax on leases under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 8and the Service Occupation Tax Act.9    (d) By resolution, the board may order the proposition for 10the imposition of the tax under this Section to be submitted at 11any election. The board shall certify the question to the 12proper election authority, who shall submit the proposition at 13an election in accordance with the general election law.14    The proposition to impose a tax for forest preserve 15purposes shall be in substantially the following form:16        "Shall the [name of forest preserve district] impose a 17    Special Forest Preserve District Retailers' Occupation Tax 18    and Service Occupation Tax (commonly referred to as a 19    "sales tax") at the rate of [insert a percentage in 20    increments of 0.25%] in [name of county] for forest 21    preserve district expenditures in accordance with and 22    subject to the provisions of Section 13.9 of the Downstate 23    Forest Preserve District Act?"24    The following additional information shall appear on the 25ballot below the question:26        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an   HB5028- 8 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1    additional [insert amount] in sales tax for every $100 of 2    tangible personal property bought at retail."3    The board may also vote to establish a sunset provision at 4which time the additional sales tax would cease being 5collected, if not terminated earlier by a vote of the board. If 6the board votes to include a sunset provision, the proposition 7for forest preserve purposes shall be in substantially the 8following form:9        "Shall the [name of forest preserve district] impose a 10    Special Forest Preserve District Retailers' Occupation Tax 11    and Service Occupation Tax (commonly referred to as a 12    "sales tax") at the rate of [insert a percentage in 13    increments of 0.25%] in [name of county] for a period not 14    to exceed [insert number of years] for forest preserve 15    district expenditures in accordance with and subject to 16    the provisions of Section 13.9 of the Downstate Forest 17    Preserve District Act?"18    The following additional information shall appear on the 19ballot below the question:20        "This would mean that a consumer would pay an 21    additional [insert amount] in sales tax for every $100 of 22    tangible personal property bought at retail. If imposed, 23    the additional tax would cease being collected at the end 24    of [insert number of years], if not terminated earlier by 25    a vote of the [name of forest preserve district board]."26    Votes shall be recorded as "Yes" or "No".  HB5028- 9 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1    If a majority of the legal voters voting on the 2proposition vote in favor of it, the district may impose the 3tax. A district may not submit more than one proposition 4authorized by this Section to the legal voters at any one time.5    (e) The Department of Revenue shall immediately pay over 6to the State Treasurer, ex officio, as trustee, all taxes and 7penalties collected under this Section to be deposited into 8the Special Forest Preserve District Retailers' and Service 9Occupation Tax Fund, a special fund that is created in the 10State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall be disbursed as 11provided in this Section.12    As soon as possible after the first day of each month and 13upon certification of the Department of Revenue, the State 14Comptroller shall order transferred, and the State Treasurer 15shall transfer, to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund the local sales 16tax increment, as defined in the Innovation Development and 17Economy Act, collected under this Section during the second 18preceding calendar month for sales within a STAR bon d 19district.20    After the monthly transfer to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, 21on or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 22Department of Revenue shall prepare and certify to the State 23Comptroller the disbursement of the stated sums of money to 24the district from retailers in the county who have paid taxes 25or penalties to the Department of Revenue during the second 26preceding calendar month. The amount to be paid to the   HB5028- 10 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1district shall be the amount collected under this Section 2during the second preceding calendar month by the Department 3of Revenue plus an amount the Department of Revenue determines 4is necessary to offset any amounts that were erroneously paid 5to a different taxing body, and not including (i) an amount 6equal to the amount of refunds made during the second 7preceding calendar month by the Department of Revenue on 8behalf of the district; (ii) any amount that the Department of 9Revenue determines is necessary to offset any amounts that 10were payable to a different taxing body but were erroneously 11paid to the district; (iii) any amounts that are transferred 12to the STAR Bonds Revenue Fund, and (iv) 1.5% of the remainder, 13which the Department of Revenue shall transfer into the Tax 14Compliance and Administration Fund. The Department of Revenue, 15at the time of each monthly disbursement to the district, 16shall prepare and certify to the State Comptroller the amount 17to be transferred into the Tax Compliance and Administration 18Fund under this subsection. No later than 10 days after 19receipt by the State Comptroller of the disbursement 20certification to the District and the Tax Compliance and 21Administration Fund provided for in this Section to be given 22to the State Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the 23State Comptroller shall cause the orders to be drawn for the 24respective amounts in accordance with directions contained in 25the certification.26    (f) For the purpose of determining whether a tax   HB5028- 11 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1authorized under this Section is applicable, a retail sale by 2a producer of coal or another mineral mined in Illinois is a 3sale at retail at the place where the coal or other mineral 4mined in Illinois is extracted from the earth. This subsection 5does not apply to coal or another mineral when it is delivered 6or shipped by the seller to the purchaser at a point outside 7Illinois so that the sale is exempt under the United States 8Constitution as a sale in interstate or foreign commerce.9    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 10authorize the board to impose a tax upon the privilege of 11engaging in any business that under the Constitution of the 12United States may not be made the subject of taxation by this 13State.14    (h) The board shall file a certified copy of the ordinance 15imposing, increasing the rate of, or discontinuing a tax under 16this Section with the Department of Revenue, together with a 17certification that the ordinance received referendum approval 18in the case of the imposition of or increase in the rate of the 19tax, either (i) after October 1 but on or before May 1, 20whereupon the Department of Revenue shall proceed to 21administer and enforce the imposition of, increase in the rate 22of, or discontinuation of the tax as of the July 1 immediately 23following the filing; or (ii) after May 1, but on or before 24October 1, whereupon the Department of Revenue shall proceed 25to administer and enforce the imposition of, increase in the 26rate of, or discontinuation of the tax as of the January 1   HB5028- 12 -LRB104 18134 WRO 31573 b1immediately following the filing. If the tax imposed under 2this Section is scheduled to sunset by referendum, the board 3is required to monitor the sunset date and notify the 4Department of Revenue of the sunset by filing a certified copy 5of an ordinance that includes the sunset date (i) after 6October 1 but on or before May 1, whereupon the Department of 7Revenue shall proceed to discontinue the tax as of the July 1 8immediately following the filing; or (ii) after May 1 but on or 9before October 1, whereupon the Department of Revenue shall 10proceed to discontinue the tax as of the January 1 immediately 11following the filing.12    (i) When certifying the amount of a monthly disbursement 13to the district under this Section, the Department of Revenue 14shall increase or decrease the amounts by an amount necessary 15to offset any misallocation of previous disbursements. The 16offset amount shall be the amount erroneously disbursed within 17the previous 6 months from the time a misallocation is 18discovered. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.